test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ritsjkas14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ritsʼkas: # Noun (14) ritsʼkas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Nom: rits'kas
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Gen: rits'ka
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Par: [rits'kast, rits'kat]
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Ill: [rits'kahe, rits'kadõ]
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Ine: [rits'kan, rits'kah, rits'kahn]
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Ela: rits'kast
     rits'kas+N+Sg+All: rits'kalõ
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Ade: rits'kal
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Abl: rits'kalt
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Tra: rits'kas
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Ter: rits'kaniq
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Abe: rits'kaldaq
     rits'kas+N+Sg+Com: rits'kagaq
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Nom: rits'kaq
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Gen: [rits'kidõ, rits'kiidõ, rits'kastõ]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Par: [rits'kit, rits'kiid]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Ill: [rits'kihe, rits'kiihe, rits'kidõ, rits'kiidõ, rits'kastõhe, rits'kastõdõ]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Ine: [rits'kin, rits'kiin, rits'kih, rits'kiih, rits'kihn, rits'kiihn, rits'kastõn, rits'kastõh, rits'kastõhn]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Ela: [rits'kist, rits'kiist, rits'kastõst]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+All: [rits'kilõ, rits'kiilõ, rits'kastõlõ]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Ade: [rits'kil, rits'kiil, rits'kastõl]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Abl: [rits'kilt, rits'kiilt, rits'kastõlt]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Tra: [rits'kis, rits'kiis, rits'kastõs]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Ter: [rits'kiniq, rits'kiiniq, rits'kastõniq]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Abe: [rits'kildaq, rits'kiildaq, rits'kastõldaq]
     rits'kas+N+Pl+Com: [rits'kidõgaq, rits'kiidõgaq, rits'kastõgaq]
